District of Columbia statutes.
44-1051.13

Services by unauthorized personnel prohibited.

A nurse staffing agency shall not knowingly provide or refer nursing personnel to a health care facility or agency, or to an individual, for the purpose of rendering temporary nursing services within the District of Columbia, if the nursing personnel being provided or referred is not authorized to provide services as a Licensed Practical Nurse or as a Registered Nurse in accordance with Chapter 12 of Title 3, or is not authorized to provide services as a Certified Nurse Aide in accordance with Chapter 32 of Title 29 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-74, § 13, 50 DCR 10914